Arkansas, session 2025, HB1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-11-108. Award of contracts to Arkansas businesses in operation less
than five years — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "state agency" means the same as defined
under § 19-11-203.
(b) The Office of State Procurement shall encourage each state agency
to award at least five percent (5%) of contracts entered into by the state
agency to businesses:
(1) That have been in operation for less than five (5) years;
and
(2) Whose principal place of business is in this state.


*MBM105*
01/31/2025 2:58:30 PM MBM105